Hawaii statutes.
§261-54 Special facility lease. (a)
In addition to the conditions and terms set forth in this part, any special
facility lease entered into by the department shall at least contain provisions
obligating the other person to the special facility lease:

(1) To pay to the department during the initial term
of the special facility lease, whether the special facility is capable of being
used or occupied or is being used or occupied by the other person, a rental or
rentals at the time or times and in the amount or amounts that will be
sufficient: to pay the principal and interest on all special facility revenue
bonds issued for the special facility, to establish or maintain any reserves
for these payments, and to pay all fees and expenses of the trustees, paying
agents, transfer agents, and other fiscal agents for the special facility
revenue bonds issued for the special facility;

(2) To pay to the department:

(A) A ground rental, equal to the fair market
rental of the land, if the land on which the special facility is located was
not acquired from the proceeds of the special facility revenue bonds; or

(B) A properly allocable share of the
administrative costs of the department in carrying out the special facility
lease and administering the special facility revenue bonds issued for the
special facility, if the land was acquired from the proceeds of the special
facility revenue bonds;

(3) To either operate, maintain, and repair the
special facility and pay the costs thereof or to pay to the department all costs
of operation, maintenance, and repair of the special facility;

(4) To:

(A) Insure, or cause to be insured, the
special facility under builder's risk insurance (or similar insurance) in the
amount of the cost of construction of the special facility to be financed from
the proceeds of the special facility revenue bonds;

(B) Procure and maintain, or cause to be
procured or maintained, to the extent commercially available, a comprehensive
insurance policy providing protection and insuring the department and its
officers, agents, servants, and employees (and so long as special facility
revenue bonds are outstanding, the trustee) against all direct or contingent
loss or liability for damages for personal injury or death or damage to
property, including loss of use thereof, occurring on or in any way related to
the special facility or occasioned by reason of occupancy by and the operations
of the other person upon, in, and around the special facility;

(C) Provide all risk casualty insurance,
including insurance against loss or damage by fire, lightning, flood,
earthquake, typhoon, or hurricane, with standard extended coverage and standard
vandalism and other malicious mischief endorsements; and

(D) Provide insurance for workers'
compensation, employer's liability, and aircraft liability (including passenger
liability) for personal injury or death or damage to property (the other party
may self-insure for workers' compensation if permitted by law);

provided that all policies with respect to
loss or damage of property including fire or other casualty and extended
coverage and builder's risk shall provide for payments of the losses to the
department, the other person, or the trustee as their respective interests may
appear; and provided further that the insurance may be procured and maintained
as part of or in conjunction with other policies carried by the other person;
and provided further that the insurance shall name the department, and so long
as any special facility revenue bonds are outstanding, the trustee, as
additional insured; and

(5) To indemnify, save, and hold the department, the
trustee and their respective agents, officers, members, and employees harmless
from and against all claims and actions and all costs and expenses incidental
to the investigation and defense thereof, by or on behalf of any person, firm,
or corporation, based upon or arising out of the special facility or the other
person's use and occupancy thereof, including, without limitation, from and
against all claims and actions based upon and arising from any:

(A) Condition of the special facility;

(B) Breach or default on the part of the
other person in the performance of any of the person's obligations under the
special facility lease;

(C) Fault or act of negligence of the other
person or the person's agents, contractors, servants, employees, or licensees;
or

(D) Accident to or injury or death of any
person or loss of or damage to any property occurring in or about the special
facility, including any claims or actions based upon or arising by reason of
the negligence or any act of the other person.

Any moneys received by the department pursuant
to paragraphs (2) and (3) shall be paid into the airport revenue fund and shall
not be nor be deemed to be revenues of the special facility.

(b) The term and all renewals and extensions
of the term of any special facility lease (including any amendments or
supplements thereto) shall not extend beyond the lesser of the reasonable life
of the special facility which is the subject of the special facility lease, as
estimated by the department at the time of the entering into thereof, or thirty
years.

(c) Any special facility lease entered into by
the department shall be subject to chapter 171 and shall contain any other
terms and conditions that the department deems advisable to effectuate the
purposes of this part. [L 1971, c 160, pt of §1; am L 1998, c 284, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next